Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 1. Surviving Remainderman or Joint Tenants

Cross references. —

As to transfer of title of decedent's motor vehicle without administration, see §

2-1-201

.

As to descent generally, see §

2-4-101

et seq.

As to proceedings to determine heirship to land, see §

2-9-201

et seq.

For provisions of the Uniform Simultaneous Death Act, see chapter 13 of this title.

For provision that the word “heirs,” etc., shall not be necessary to convey fee simple in real estate, see §

34-2-101

.

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

20 Am. Jur. 2d Cotenancy and Joint Ownership §§ 3 to 21; 51 Am. Jur. 2d Life Tenants and Remaindermen §§ 1 to 26.

Creation of right of survivorship by instrument ineffective to create estate by entireties, 1 ALR2d 247.

Murder of life tenant by remainderman or reversioner as affecting latter's rights to remainder or reversion, 24 ALR2d 1120.

Felonious killing of one cotenant or tenant by the entireties by the other as affecting the latter's right in the property, 42 ALR3d 1116.

Issuance of stock certificate to joint tenants as creating gift inter vivos, 5 ALR4th 373.

25A C.J.S. Death §§ 1, 4 to 16; 31 C.J.S. Estates § 65; 48 C.J.S. Joint Tenancy §§ 1, 4.

§ 2-9-101.
Petition to establish rights upon death of owner of life estate or joint interest in realty; notice; decree; recording and effect thereof.

If any person dies seized of a life estate which terminates by reason of his death, or of an estate by the entireties, or of an estate by joint tenancy or joint estate with another, any person interested in the property or in the title thereto may file in the district court of the county in which the property is situated a verified petition setting forth such facts. After two (2) weeks notice by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, or otherwise as the court may order, the court shall hear the petition and the evidence offered in support thereof. If upon hearing it appears to the court that such life estate, estate by entireties, estate by joint tenancy or joint estate was created and vested, and that the life estate of the deceased person terminated by reason of death, or that the estate by entireties remains vested solely in the surviving spouse by reason of death, or that the estate by joint tenancy or joint estate remains vested solely in the surviving joint tenant or joint tenants, the court shall so decree. A certified copy of the decree shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk and thereafter the decree and the record thereof together with the record of the instrument or instruments purporting to create the life estate, estate by entireties, estate by joint tenancy or joint estate, shall be presumptive evidence of the creation of such estate, the termination thereof and the survivorship of the estate by entireties, estates by joint tenancy or joint estate.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 20, § 15; R.S. 1899, § 4556; C.S. 1910, § 5472; C.S. 1920, § 6744; R.S. 1931, § 88-916; Laws 1939, ch. 69, § 1; 1945, ch. 127, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 6-2715; W.S. 1957, § 34-97; W.S. 1977, §

34-6-101

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Existing causes of action. —

Section 2, ch. 127, Laws 1945, reads: “Proceedings heretofore initiated or completed in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 69, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1939, prior to this amendment and re-enactment thereof, shall be deemed to have been initiated or completed, as the case may be, in accordance herewith and such shall constitute the same presumptive evidence with respect thereto as if initiated or completed hereunder.”

Legislative intent. —

Legislature by statute relating to termination of life estates and estates by entireties by death, providing for service of process on two weeks notice by publication did not mean to provide for conclusive judgment at least as to interested parties within state whose residence is known. In re Bergman's Survivorship, 60 Wyo. 355, 151 P.2d 360,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1944).

Requirements for creating joint estate or estate by entiretyin personal property. —

In order to create in Wyoming a joint tenancy or tenancy by the entirety in personal property, there must exist one of the following minimum requirements: (1) Each of the four unities of interest, time, title and possession must be present, with the added unity of person for a tenancy by the entirety; or (2) in the absence of one or more of the first four unities, it must be evident from the language of the instrument itself that the parties thereto intended to create a right of survivorship. Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

Right of survivorship cannot be defeated by will. —

A joint tenant in an estate with the right of survivorship cannot destroy the right of the other joint tenant in survivorship by means of a will executed after the creation of the joint tenancy. Nussbacher v. Manderfeld, 64 Wyo. 55, 186 P.2d 548,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1947).

Estate by entirety during lifetime of parties changeable onlyby joint action or operation of law. —

During the lifetime of husband and wife in an estate by the entirety, the estate can be changed or severed only by the voluntary joint acts of both parties or by operation of law, etc., by divorce. Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

And death of one party vests estate solely in other. —

After one of the parties to an estate by the entirety dies, the estate is vested solely in the surviving spouse. Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

Personal notice on resident claimants required. —

Estate by entirety is created by deed and property vests absolutely in survivor upon death of spouse, and proceeding by survivor to exclude others from interest is not part of probate proceeding and requires personal notice upon a resident adversary. In re Bergman's Survivorship, 60 Wyo. 355, 151 P.2d 360,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1944).

Statute of frauds inapplicable. —

In an action under this section by a surviving husband for a declaration terminating joint tenancy in lands conveyed to husband and wife as joint tenants and vesting title to said land in the husband as the surviving tenant, it could not be contended by heirs of the deceased wife that the surviving husband sought to charge the deceased wife and her estate with a purported agreement which was never subscribed and signed by her in violation of the provisions of the statute of frauds (§

1-23-105

), since the statute of frauds does not apply to completely executed agreements. Nussbacher v. Manderfeld, 64 Wyo. 55, 186 P.2d 548,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1947).

Effect given to decisions under law of origin. —

Legislature adopting original California statute did not evade effect of California decisions by prescribing notice previously prescribed and fixed by the court. In re Bergman's Survivorship, 60 Wyo. 355, 151 P.2d 360,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1944).

Law reviews. —

For an address on tenancy by the entirety in Wyoming, see 3 Wyo. L.J. 66.

For a note on liability of the survivor for payment of an obligation secured by entireties property, see 13 Wyo. L.J. 267.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and effect of one spouse's conveyance to other spouse of interest in property held as estate by the entireties, 18 ALR5th 230.

§ 2-9-102.
Affidavit of survivorship; recordation; copy of death certificate to be attached.

If any person dies who is the owner of a life estate which terminates by reason of his death, or if any person dies who is the owner with his surviving spouse of an estate by entireties, or if any person dies who is the owner with another of a joint estate or an estate in joint tenancy, any person interested in the affected property or the title thereto may make the death a matter of record by recording in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the property is situate an affidavit describing the property, the instrument under which the estate was vested with appropriate references to its recording data if the instrument was recorded, and certifying under oath to the death of the decedent as the party who was named in and whose death terminated his previous estate in the property under the vesting instrument. The affidavit shall have attached thereto a copy of the official death certificate of the decedent, certified to by the public authority in which the original death certificate is a matter of record.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 100, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 6-2716; W.S. 1957, § 34-98; W.S. 1977, § 34-6-102; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to death registration generally, see §

35-1-418

et seq.

Effect of affidavit of survivorship. —

Affidavit of survivorship did not establish grant of an easement, but merely established that affiant had succeeded to interest of a deceased joint owner. Dudley v. Franklin, 983 P.2d 1223,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1999).

Applied

in

Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).

§ 2-9-103.
Affidavit of survivorship; prima facie evidence; procedure deemed independent.

Each affidavit signed, sworn to and recorded substantially in compliance with the provisions of W.S.

2-9-102

, constitutes prima facie evidence that all facts recited therein are true. The permissive and nonjudicial procedure provided by W.S.

2-9-102

and

2-9-103

shall be independent of and shall not affect or be affected by the procedure provided under W.S.

2-9-101

.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 100, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 6-2717; W.S. 1957, § 34-99; W.S. 1977, § 34-6-103; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Applied

in

Wambeke v. Hopkin, 372 P.2d 470,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1962).